Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2705.03
Direct payment
permit; revocation; relinquishment.

(1) The holder
of a direct payment permit holds the permit as a revocable privilege. The
Tax Commissioner may revoke a direct payment permit. The Tax Commissioner
shall mail notice of revocation
to the permitholder. The
decision of the Tax Commissioner to revoke a direct payment permit is not
appealable.

(2) A permitholder may voluntarily relinquish a direct payment
permit.

(3) Upon revocation or relinquishment of a direct payment
permit, the permitholder shall notify all retailers given copies of the permit
that it has been revoked or relinquished. Failure to give the notice shall
be treated as a failure to pay sales and use taxes.

Laws 1997, LB 182A, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 40.